Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
CHAPTER 197 Penitentiaries

197.010.
Definitions for chapter.

Definitions as used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Cabinet” means the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet;

“Classification” means the systematic assignment of a prisoner to a custody level, program, and penitentiary;

“Department” means Department of Corrections;

“Eligible sexual offender” means a sexual offender for whom the sentencing court, department officials, or both have determined that he or she:

Has demonstrated evidence of a mental, emotional, or behavioral disorder, but not active psychosis or an intellectual disability; and

Is likely to benefit from the program;

“Life skills program” means a program that provides strategies for offenders to assist in removing barriers to successful reintegration into the community and addresses skill areas, including time management, money management, use of technology, communication, and social skills;

“Penitentiaries” includes the state penal institutions for males at Eddyville, LaGrange, the Green River Correctional Complex, the Luther Luckett Correctional Complex, the Kentucky Correctional Institute for Women, the Northpoint Training Center, the Roederer Correctional Complex, the Eastern Kentucky Correctional Complex, the Western Kentucky Correctional Complex, Frankfort Career Development Center, Blackburn Correctional Complex, and Bell County Forestry Camp, together with the branches thereof, any private prison as provided by KRS 197.500, and any other similar institutions hereafter established;

“Promising practices” means programs and strategies that have some research or data showing positive outcomes, but do not have enough evidence yet to meet the standard of an evidence-based program;

“Sexual offender” means any person convicted of, pleading guilty to, or entering an Alford plea to a sex crime as defined in KRS 17.500; and

“State agency” means any department, board, commission, or agency of the state government.

History.
3828c-1: amend. Acts 1962, ch. 106, Art. X, § 9; 1964, ch. 165, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(14); 1982, ch. 344, § 20, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 106, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 315, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 497, § 9, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 211, § 43, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 445, § 4, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 418, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 2006, ch. 182, § 21, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 85, § 230, effective June 26, 2007; 2012, ch. 146, § 26, effective July 12, 2012; 2019 ch. 116, § 1, effective June 27, 2019.

197.011.
Name of women’s institution.

The institution for women shall be known as “The Kentucky Correctional Institution for Women.”

History.
Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 165, § 2.

197.020.
Administrative regulations to be promulgated by Department of Corrections — Fee for use of medical facilities — Reimbursement of telehealth consultations — Use of jail medical facilities by state prisoner governed by KRS 441.045.

The Department of Corrections shall:

Promulgate administrative regulations for the government and discipline of the penitentiary, for the government and official conduct of all officials connected with the penitentiary, and for the government of the prisoners in their deportment and conduct;

Promulgate administrative regulations for the character of food and diet of the prisoners; the preservation of the health of the prisoners; the daily cleansing of the penitentiary; the cleanliness of the persons of the prisoners; the general sanitary government of the penitentiary and prisoners; the character of the labor; the quantity of food and clothing; and the length of time during which the prisoners shall be employed daily;

Promulgate administrative regulations, as the department deems necessary, for the disposition of abandoned, lost, or confiscated property of prisoners;

Promulgate administrative regulations for the administration of a validated risk and needs assessment to assess the criminal risk factors and correctional needs of all inmates upon commitment to the department;

Promulgate administrative regulations to create a certification process for county jails that may house female state inmates. The administrative regulations shall include a requirement of a physical barrier between male and female inmates; and

Cause the administrative regulations promulgated by the department, together with the law allowing commutation of time to prisoners for good conduct, to be printed and posted in conspicuous places in the cell houses and workshops.

The department may impose a reasonable fee for the use of medical facilities by a prisoner who has the ability to pay for the medical and dental care. These funds may be deducted from the prisoner’s inmate account. A prisoner shall not be denied medical or dental treatment because he or she has insufficient funds in his or her inmate account.

The department may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement a program that provides for reimbursement of telehealth consultations.

Fees for the use of medical facilities by a state prisoner who is confined in a jail pursuant to KRS 532.100 or other statute shall be governed by KRS 441.045.

History.
216c-4: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 255, § 188; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(14); 1982, ch. 344, § 21, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 44, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 445, § 5, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 406, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 376, § 23, effective July 14, 2000; 2007, ch. 85, § 231, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 8, § 2, effective July 15, 2010; 2011, ch. 2, § 27, effective June 8, 2011; 2018 ch. 115, § 3, effective July 14, 2018; 2020 ch. 109, § 4, effective April 24, 2020.

197.022.
Personal attendance of state prisoner in civil action — Transportation orders — Payment of costs — Participation of prisoner in action by alternative methods allowed.

Whenever a court finds the personal attendance of a state prisoner is necessary in a civil action and orders the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet or its agent or any law enforcement officer to transport a prisoner in connection with the civil action, the party requesting that the state prisoner be transported to the hearing shall pay the transportation cost, which shall include the estimated round trip cost, including the state mileage rate and the estimated associated salary cost of correctional staff.

The court shall cause all transportation orders to be delivered to the warden or jailer of the detention facility where the prisoner resides. As soon as practicable after the receipt of the order, the warden or jailer shall notify the prisoner and the court of the total transportation cost. If the payment is not received twenty-four (24) hours in advance of the scheduled hearing, no transportation shall be provided, irrespective of the order of the court commanding the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet or its agent or other law enforcement officer to transport a prisoner.

To the extent practicable, any action concerning a prisoner in which the court has determined that the prisoner’s participation is required or permitted may be conducted by telephone, video conference, or other telecommunications technology without removing the prisoner from the facility in which the prisoner is confined.

The provisions of this section pertaining to payment of transportation costs shall not apply to parties who have been determined by the court to be indigent within the meaning of KRS Chapter 31 or other applicable law.

The Justice and Public Safety Cabinet shall promulgate an administrative regulation or regulations governing this process.

History.
Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 139, § 9, effective June 26, 2007.

197.023.
Duty to maintain grievance reports — Open record — Content — Destruction.

Each facility operated by the Department of Corrections or under contract to the department shall maintain reports of all grievances by inmates during a calendar year. A grievance report shall be an open public record and made available to any person who requests to see the file at the site as long as the inmate has signed a waiver of confidentiality.

Each grievance report shall contain the date the grievance was filed, the nature of the grievance, the name of the individual filing the grievance as well as the name of the person preparing the report, the residence, the county, actions taken by the facility, and the date the report was filed. The report shall be signed by an administrator or officer of the facility.

With the written permission of the inmate, a photocopy of the file may be made and the content may be released to the public. The facility may require a ten cent ($0.10) per page copying fee.

All grievance reports may be destroyed after December 31 of the following year.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 606, § 135, effective July 15, 1998.

197.025.
Restrictions on access to inmate and facility records — Appeal procedure — Restrictions on access to policies and procedure.

KRS 61.870 to 61.884 to the contrary notwithstanding, no person shall have access to any records if the disclosure is deemed by the commissioner of the department or his designee to constitute a threat to the security of the inmate, any other inmate, correctional staff, the institution, or any other person.

KRS 61.870 to 61.884 to the contrary notwithstanding, the department shall not be required to comply with a request for any record from any inmate confined in a jail or any facility or any individual on active supervision under the jurisdiction of the department, unless the request is for a record which contains a specific reference to that individual.

KRS 61.870 to 61.884 to the contrary notwithstanding, all persons confined in a penal facility shall challenge any denial of an open record with the Attorney General by mailing or otherwise sending the appropriate documents to the Attorney General within twenty (20) days of the denial pursuant to the procedures set out in KRS 61.880(2) before an appeal can be filed in a Circuit Court.

KRS 61.870 to 61.884 to the contrary notwithstanding, the Department of Corrections shall refuse to accept the hand delivery of an open records request from a confined inmate.

KRS 61.870 to 61.884 to the contrary notwithstanding, all records containing information expunged pursuant to law shall not be open to the public.

The policies and procedures or administrative regulations of the department which address the security and control of inmates and penitentiaries shall not be accessible to the public or inmates. The Administrative Regulations Review Subcommittee’s review process for any of these policies and procedures or administrative regulations, which may be filed with the regulations compiler, shall be conducted in closed sessions and held confidential.

KRS 61.870 to 61.884 to the contrary notwithstanding, upon receipt of a request for any record, the department shall respond to the request within five (5) days after receipt of the request, excepting Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, and state whether the record may be inspected or may not be inspected, or that the record is unavailable and when the record is expected to be available.

History.
Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 497, § 22, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 211, § 45, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 445, § 6, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 418, § 4, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 334, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 406, § 4, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 345, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 11, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2007, ch. 139, § 8, effective June 26, 2007.

197.030.
Department may contract for construction of railroads on penitentiary property.

The Department of Corrections may enter into a contract with any railroad company for the construction of railroad switches, sidetracks, or spurs into the yards of the penitentiaries of the state, and may sell and convey rights-of-way owned by the state to any railroad company, and may grant rights-of-way to railroads across any penitentiary property of the state.

History.
216c-4: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(14); 1982, ch. 344, § 22, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 46, effective July 14, 1992.

197.035.
Computation of consecutive or concurrent sentence.

A sentence, on conviction of a felony, imposed upon a confined prisoner for a crime committed prior to the date of his instant commitment, if designated to be served consecutively, shall be added to the sentence or sentences being served.

If the additional sentence is designated to be served concurrently, or the commitment is silent, he shall be considered as having started to serve said sentence on the day he was committed on the first sentence.

History.
Enact. Acts 1963 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 8.

197.040.
Commutation of sentence. [Repealed.]

197.041.
Credit for period confined on reversal and second conviction.

If a defendant is confined in the penitentiary during the pendency of an appeal and, on reversal, is again convicted, he shall be given credit for the period so confined in determining his date of eligibility for parole and his date of release by expiration of sentence.

History.
Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 234, § 17.

197.045.
Credit on sentence for prior confinement, educational accomplishment, good behavior, or meritorious service — Requirement of completion of sex offender treatment program for eligible sexual offenders — Forfeiture of credit for certain dismissals of inmates’ civil actions — Payments for jails upon prisoner completion of department-approved program and sentence credit.

Any person convicted and sentenced to a state penal institution:

Shall receive a credit on his or her sentence for:

Prior confinement as specified in KRS 532.120;

Successfully receiving a High School Equivalency Diploma or a high school diploma, a college degree, a completed vocational or technical education program, or a correspondence postsecondary education program which results in a diploma or degree, as provided, defined, and approved by the department in the amount of ninety (90) days per diploma, degree, or technical education program completed;

Successfully completing a drug treatment program, evidence-based program, or any other promising practice or life skills program approved by the department, in the amount of not more than ninety (90) days for each program completed. The department shall determine criteria to establish whether a life skills or promising practice program is eligible for sentence credits. Programs shall demonstrate learning of skills necessary for reintegration into the community to minimize barriers to successful reentry. Approval of programs shall be subject to review by the cabinet; and

May receive a credit on his or her sentence for:

Good behavior in an amount not exceeding ten (10) days for each month served, to be determined by the department from the conduct of the prisoner;

Performing exceptionally meritorious service or performing duties of outstanding importance in connection with institutional operations and programs, awarded at the discretion of the commissioner in an amount not to exceed seven (7) days per month; and

Acts of exceptional service during times of emergency, awarded at the discretion of the commissioner in an amount not to exceed seven (7) days per month.

Except for a sentencing credit awarded for prior confinement, the department may forfeit any sentencing credit awarded under subsection (1) of this section previously earned by the prisoner or deny the prisoner the right to earn future sentencing credit in any amount if during the term of imprisonment, a prisoner commits any offense or violates the rules of the institution.

When two (2) or more consecutive sentences are to be served, the several sentences shall be merged and served in the aggregate for the purposes of the sentencing credit computation or in computing dates of expiration of sentence.

Until successful completion of the sex offender treatment program, an eligible sexual offender may earn sentencing credit. However, the sentencing credit shall not be credited to the eligible sexual offender’s sentence. Upon the successful completion of the sex offender treatment program, as determined by the program director, the offender shall be eligible for all sentencing credit earned but not otherwise forfeited under administrative regulations promulgated by the Department of Corrections. After successful completion of the sex offender treatment program, an eligible sexual offender may continue to earn sentencing credit in the manner provided by administrative regulations promulgated by the Department of Corrections. Any eligible sexual offender, as defined in KRS 197.410, who has not successfully completed the sex offender treatment program as determined by the program director shall not be entitled to the benefit of any credit on his or her sentence. A sexual offender who does not complete the sex offender treatment program for any reason shall serve his or her entire sentence without benefit of sentencing credit, parole, or other form of early release. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any sexual offender convicted before July 15, 1998, or to any sexual offender with an intellectual disability.

The Department of Corrections shall, by administrative regulation, specify the length of forfeiture of sentencing credit and the ability to earn sentencing credit in the future for those inmates who have civil actions dismissed because the court found the action to be malicious, harassing, or factually frivolous.
(5) (a)

The Department of Corrections shall, by administrative regulation, specify the length of forfeiture of sentencing credit and the ability to earn sentencing credit in the future for those inmates who have civil actions dismissed because the court found the action to be malicious, harassing, or factually frivolous.

Penalties set by administrative regulation pursuant to this subsection shall be as uniform as practicable throughout all institutions operated by, under contract to, or under the control of the department and shall specify a specific number of days or months of sentencing credit forfeited as well as any prohibition imposed on the future earning of sentencing credit.

Starting in fiscal year 2021-2022 and through fiscal year 2023-2024, if a state prisoner is confined in a jail pursuant to KRS 532.100 and earns sentencing credits under subsection (1)(a)2. or 3. of this section while confined in that jail, at the end of that prisoner’s period of confinement in that jail, the department shall pay a fee to the unit of local government or regional jail authority responsible for the administration of that jail as follows:

For every Department of Corrections-approved program completed which resulted in the issuance of a ninety (90) day sentencing credit, a payment of one thousand dollars ($1,000) shall be made;

For every Department of Corrections-approved program completed which resulted in the issuance of a sixty (60) day sentencing credit, a payment of six hundred dollars ($600) shall be made; and

For every Department of Corrections-approved program completed which resulted in the issuance of a thirty (30) day sentencing credit, a payment of three hundred dollars ($300) shall be made.

The provisions in subsection (1)(a)2. of this section shall apply retroactively to July 1, 2018.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 102, § 1; 1962, ch. 109, § 1; 1970, ch. 90, § 1; 1974, ch. 146, § 1; 1982, ch. 344, § 23, effective July 15, 1982; 1990, ch. 497, § 12, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 211, § 42, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 445, § 7, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 118, § 6, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 145, § 6, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 606, § 24, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 345, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2006, ch. 182, § 22, effective July 12, 2006; 2010, ch. 107, § 3, effective July 15, 2010; 2011, ch. 2, § 36, effective June 8, 2011; 2012, ch. 146, § 27, effective July 12, 2012; 2013, ch. 69, § 9, effective June 25, 2013; 2014, ch. 94, § 5, effective July 15, 2014; 2017 ch. 63, § 25, effective June 29, 2017; 2019 ch. 116, § 2, effective June 27, 2019; 2021 ch. 194, § 4, effective April 7, 2021.

197.047.
Credit on sentence for work on governmental services program-related project — Eligibility — Computation of credit — Forfeiture of credit.

As used in this section, “governmental services program-related project” means a project involving work for:
(1) (a)

As used in this section, “governmental services program-related project” means a project involving work for:

The Commonwealth or an agency of the Commonwealth; or

A county, urban-county, charter county, city, consolidated local government, special district, or an agency of any of these entities.

Work on a governmental services program shall not confer private benefit on a person except as may be incidental to the public benefit.

The department shall promulgate an administrative regulation governing prisoners working on governmental services program-related projects.

A prisoner shall not begin work on a particular governmental services program-related project without the approval of the director of the relevant entity referred to in subsection (1)(a) of this section, or the director’s designee.

Participation in governmental services program-related projects shall not be deemed employment for any purpose, and a prisoner shall not be deemed an employee or agent of the entity for which he or she performs the community service work.

A Department of Corrections administrative regulation shall set forth the amount of compensation a prisoner shall earn for any work-related project, and any prisoner who works on a governmental services program shall receive an amount equal to one-half (1/2) of the established compensation for such work and shall be eligible to receive a sentence credit as set forth below.

The sentence credit provisions of this section shall not apply to a prisoner who is serving a:

Sentence of imprisonment for life without possibility of parole;

Sentence for a violent offense as defined in KRS 439.3401;

Sentence for escape or attempted escape; or

Sentence for a sex crime as defined in KRS 17.500.

The department may grant sentence credits to inmates confined in a detention facility for labor performed in a governmental services program or within a detention facility for the maintenance of the facility or for the operation of facility services such as food service.

Credit, if granted, shall be uniform and shall be based on the following:

For every eight (8) full hours of work, one (1) sentence credit shall be earned;

For every five (5) sentence credits earned, one (1) day of the sentence to be served by the inmate shall be deducted; and

Sentence credits shall be deducted from the maximum expiration date of the sentence.

The department may forfeit any credit previously earned by the prisoner or deny the prisoner the right to earn this work credit or the right to earn work credit in any amount if, during the term of imprisonment, a prisoner commits any offense or violates the rules of the institution.

Any other provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding, the labor of state inmates shall not be used on any construction, building, or building maintenance project outside the prison where use of such labor would reduce skilled employment opportunities of citizens of the Commonwealth. Skilled employment includes but is not limited to labor ordinarily performed by skilled tradespersons.

History.
Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 79, § 1, effective June 24, 2003.

197.050.
Warden to inform prisoners of law on escapes.

The warden of the penitentiary shall cause each prisoner, when received into the penitentiary, to be informed of the contents of Chapter 520 and KRS 506.010.

History.
1233: amend. Acts 1980, ch. 188, § 147, effective July 15, 1980; 1984, ch. 401, § 3, effective July 13, 1984.

197.055.
Education program on AIDS — Policies for inmates — Testing program.

The Department of Corrections, in conjunction with the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, shall establish a mandatory introductory and continuing education program on human immunodeficiency virus and acquired immunodeficiency syndrome for all inmates. Programs shall be specifically designed for inmates while incarcerated and in preparation for release into the community. Consideration shall be given to cultural and other relevant differences among inmates in the development of educational materials and shall include emphasis on behavior and attitude change. The education program shall be continuously updated to reflect the latest medical information available.

If there is evidence that an inmate, while in the custody of the department, has engaged in behavior which places the inmate at a high risk of transmitting or contracting a human immunodeficiency disorder, the department shall begin a testing program which is consistent with guidelines of the Centers for Disease Control and recommendations of the correctional medical authority and shall target persons who have been involved in or reasonably thought to have been involved in a high-risk behavior. For purposes of this subsection, “high-risk behavior” includes:

Sexual contact with any person within the institution;

The use of intravenous drugs;

Tattooing; and

Any other activity medically known to transmit the virus.

The results of the tests shall become a part of that inmate’s medical file, accessible only to persons designated by agency administrative regulations.

The department shall establish policies consistent with guidelines of the Centers for Disease Control and recommendations of the correctional medical authority on the housing, physical contact, dining, recreation, and exercise hours or locations for inmates with immunodeficiency disorders as are medically indicated and consistent with the proper operation of its facilities.

The department shall report to the General Assembly by July 1 each year as to the implementation of this program and the participation by inmates and staff.

If an inmate is involved in a situation with a department employee which could result, according to the institution’s physician, in the transmission of the human immunodeficiency virus infection, the inmate shall be tested.

All testing procedures, disclosure, and payment shall be pursuant to KRS 438.250.

History.
Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 443, § 36, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 211, § 47, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 309, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 426, § 131, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 171, effective June 20, 2005.

197.057.
Course for inmates on prevention of pediatric abusive head trauma.

The department shall make available a one and one-half (1.5) hour course for inmates that addresses the prevention of pediatric abusive head trauma, as defined in KRS 620.020. In addition to presenting the consequences of vigorously shaking an infant or young child, this course shall suggest methods of calming crying infants, techniques for caregivers to use to calm themselves when confronted with an infant that is crying inconsolably, and discuss selecting appropriate care providers for infant children. Training in recognizing pediatric abusive head trauma may be designed in collaboration with organizations and agencies that specialize in the prevention and recognition of pediatric abusive head trauma approved by the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services.

The department shall encourage local jails to provide a course similar to that described in subsection (1) of this section.

History.
Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 171, § 5, effective July 15, 2010.

197.060.
Classification of prisoners. [Repealed.]

197.061.
Property of inmates — Preservation of evidence or contraband. [Repealed.]

197.065.
Classification and segregation of prisoners in penal institutions — Transfer between institutions.

The commissioner shall classify all prisoners and segregate the prisoners in all of the state penal institutions and reformatories according to their past records, the probability of their being rehabilitated, the influence such prisoners might exert upon fellow prisoners, and for any other purpose that the commissioner, in his discretion, may deem sufficient for the discipline of the prisoners in any institution or reformatory, and for the rehabilitation of any prisoners.

For the purposes of carrying out subsection (1) of this section, the commissioner shall direct and compel the transfer of any prisoner from any penal institution or reformatory, irrespective of the order of the court committing the prisoner to any one (1) institution or reformatory.

History.
Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 31, §§ 1, 2; 1982, ch. 344, § 24, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 49, effective July 14, 1992.

197.070.
Employment of prisoners — Manufacture of clothing — Industrial training.

The Department of Corrections shall provide employment for all prisoners in the penitentiaries and it shall exhaust every resource at its command to provide employment for all prisoners in its custody.

The department shall acquire necessary equipment and materials and have manufactured all clothing, except that privately furnished, that is needed for the usual and suitable clothing of all state prisoners, and of all inmates in all state institutions, who are required to be clothed by the state. The department shall acquire equipment for the manufacture and production of all other state supplies, that in the reasonable discretion of the department is deemed practicable, and shall have the products manufactured, sold, and distributed as provided in this chapter.

The department shall establish industrial training in the penitentiaries and shall classify state prisoners according to the uses for prison labor and ability and talent of the prisoners, utilizing the best available local talent and other talent that may be obtained at an economical and practical cost, and shall select a suitable number of guards with the qualifications, when possible, and thereby avoid duplicate expense.

History.
3828c-3: amend. Acts 1968, ch. 76, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(14); 1982, ch. 344, § 25, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 50, effective July 14, 1992.

197.080.
Prisoners to manufacture license plates. [Repealed.]

197.090.
Prisoners may be required to manufacture road signs. [Repealed.]

197.100.
Sale of products of prison labor. [Repealed.]

197.105.
Prison Industry Enhancement Certification Program (PIECP) — Lease of labor of state prisoners within department’s facilities for production of nonagricultural goods for sale to public and private buyers.

The department may administer a Prison Industry Enhancement Certification Program (PIECP) and may lease the labor of state prisoners within the boundaries of the state’s Department of Corrections facilities for the production of nonagricultural goods for sale to both public and private buyers, if the department meets the conditions set out in this section. This section shall apply only to the leasing of labor in accordance with a PIECP and not to programs otherwise operated by Kentucky Correctional Industries.

The department shall not lease the labor of a prisoner who does not consent in writing to the leasing of that prisoner’s labor.

The department shall retain full responsibility for the care, custody, and control of the prisoner and shall supply appropriate security and custody services without cost to the person leasing the labor.

The department shall ensure that the prisoner is paid wages at a rate not less than that paid for work of a similar nature in the locality in which the work takes place, as determined by the Labor Cabinet, and never less than the federal minimum wage. The final decision on the appropriate wage, in keeping with federal and state labor and wage laws, shall be made by the Labor Cabinet.

The department shall not allow a prisoner whose labor has been leased under this section to:

Engage in work that would result in the displacement of employed workers in the specific Department of Corrections locale. As used in this paragraph, a displaced employed worker is:

A civilian worker employed in the same task by the employer leasing or applying to lease prisoner labor, who would lose his or her job if the prisoner labor were leased; or

A civilian worker who is employed full-time and, as a result of the prisoner labor lease, is forced to work part-time, regardless of wage increase.

Labor in a skill, craft, or trade in which there is a surplus of labor for that skill, craft, or trade in that specific Department of Corrections locale;

Perform any work that would impair existing contracts for goods or services;

Perform leased work outside of Department of Corrections facilities; or

Perform leased construction work inside or outside Department of Corrections facilities.

Before the commencement of any leased labor project at a Department of Corrections facility under this section, the department shall:

Receive a written projection from the Labor Cabinet that the leased labor project shall not result in acts prohibited by subsection (5)(a) to (c) of this section;

Receive written documentation from the employer leasing or applying to lease prisoner labor agreeing to not displace any of its nonprisoner employees with leased prisoner labor;

Have written documentation of consultation with local unions representing labor in the specific Department of Corrections facility’s locale in any skill, craft, or trade in which a prisoner may labor at that facility. If a local union is not available, the department shall consult with a similar statewide union. The department shall present this information to the Kentucky State Corrections Commission;

Have written documentation of consultation with local private businesses that may be economically impacted by the leased labor project. The department shall present this information to the Kentucky State Corrections Commission; and

Have written documentation of compliance with the National Environmental Policy Act (NEPA).

The leasing of prisoner labor shall not be deemed to create an employer-employee relationship between the person leasing the labor of the prisoner and the prisoner. However, the person leasing the labor of the prisoner shall provide for workers’ compensation coverage for the prisoner and, if applicable, Social Security coverage for the prisoner.

A prisoner, as a condition of participation in a program operating under the provisions of this section, shall agree to the deductions from the prisoner’s earnings set out in this subsection. The department or the person leasing the labor of the prisoner shall deduct, in the following order, from a prisoner’s gross wages:

If the prisoner is the subject of a court or administrative order for the support of a dependent, no less than twenty-five percent (25%) for the payment of the court or administratively ordered support. These deducted wages shall be paid to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services’ Child Support Enforcement Program for disbursement in accordance with federal and state law;

Twenty percent (20%) to be paid to the crime victim’s compensation fund established in KRS 49.480;

Applicable federal, state, and local taxes, including Social Security if applicable; and

Reasonable room and board fees established by the department by administrative regulation.

The department shall require any person leasing the labor of a prisoner to post bond, with good surety, in an amount determined by the department, against any judgment that may be entered against the department arising from the leasing of prisoner labor to that person.

In leasing prisoner labor under this section, the department shall seek to have the labor leased to the highest responsible bidder.

The department shall provide for reasonable access to the grounds of the Department of Corrections facilities for the person leasing the inmate labor and for the location of the work and the transporting and siting of equipment and supplies, with the security of the public being paramount.

The department may promulgate administrative regulations to implement the provisions of this section.

A civilian worker is not considered displaced for the purposes of this paragraph if the civilian worker remains employed in a job acceptable to that worker and at equal or higher wages than that worker previously received. The employer shall provide whatever retraining is required of the civilian worker at no cost to the civilian worker;

Total deductions from a prisoner’s gross wages shall not exceed eighty percent (80%).

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2017 ch. 158, § 27, effective June 29, 2017; 2017 ch. 167, § 21, effective June 29, 2017.

197.110.
Administrative regulations relating to classification, work, and pay of prisoners.

The Department of Corrections shall promulgate administrative regulations it deems necessary and proper in relation to:

The classification of prisoners;

The terms and conditions under which prisoners may be assigned to work under the direction of any other state agency;

The adequate care, supervision, guarding, discipline, maintenance, transportation, and housing of prisoners when assigned to work outside of the prison. The department shall ascertain from the jailer of the county in which the work is being carried on if accommodations are available, and shall place as many prisoners as possible under the care of the jailer;

The payment of money to prisoners and their dependents for work performed, including the amount to be paid and the manner of the payment and distribution thereof;

Any other purposes as the department deems necessary and proper for carrying out the intent of this chapter.

History.
3828b-11: amend. Acts 1958, ch. 126, § 26; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(14); 1982, ch. 344, § 26, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 51, effective July 14, 1992; 2007, ch. 85, § 232, effective June 26, 2007.